New York, session 2025-2026, S3862.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraph 8 of subsection (a) of section 3203 of the insur- 2 ance law is amended by adding two new subparagraphs (K) and (L) to read 3 as follows: 4 (K) that the agent has fully explained all of the terms and conditions 5 of the policy loan to the policyholder; 6 (L) all of the terms and conditions of any policy loan shall be in 7 writing in at least ten point type and shall be signed by the insured 8 and the agent of the insurer; 9 § 2. This act shall take effect on the sixtieth day after it shall 10 have become a law and shall apply to all policies issued, reviewed or 11 modified on or after such effective date. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD05377-01-5